Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

Capitol Grounds and Annexes

4-8-101. Care of buildings and fixtures — Preservation of order — Virtual tour.

Except as otherwise provided by subdivision (a)(2), it is the duty of the department of general services, through the commissioner, to take care of and preserve the state capitol and capitol annexes and all the furniture, fixtures and the capitol grounds, and to keep the same in good order.

It is the duty of the department of general services, through the commissioner acting with approval of the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives, to take care of and preserve the second floor of the state capitol, including all chambers, galleries, offices, rooms, hallways, balconies, storage areas and other spaces therein, and all associated furniture and fixtures and to keep the same in good order.

The secretary of state is authorized to produce a virtual tour of the state capitol, capitol annexes and grounds and to publish the virtual tour on the websites of the general assembly and of the secretary of state. The secretary of state may reproduce the virtual tour on electronic media. The secretary of state is further authorized, acting through the state librarian and archivist, to distribute to any public or private elementary, middle, junior high or senior high school the virtual tour on electronic media.

The department, through proper agencies, has the authority to preserve order among visitors who may be in and around the capitol and annexes, and to keep improper persons out of the different offices and rooms, in the absence of the regular occupants.

Acts 1899, ch. 198, § 2; Shan., § 301; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 33, 34; Code 1932, § 419; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, §§ 5, 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-801; Acts 2010, ch. 1062, § 2; 2012, ch. 557, § 1.

Cross-References. State capitol commission, title 4, ch. 8, part 3.

Uncodified public acts relating to public buildings, Index to Uncodified Public Chapters, Volume 16.

Attorney General Opinions. The general assembly does not need to enact legislation authorizing the prohibition of smoking in the Capitol building because authority to establish a smoking policy already exists; however, it may enact legislation to modify existing statutes, OAG 03-099, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 115 (8/13/03).

4-8-102. Superintendence of deliveries and shipments.

The department of general services shall superintend the delivery of supplies of fuel, water and stationery for the different departments of the state government, the delivery of all necessary dispatches and communications, and the packing and shipments of the acts, journals and other public documents.

Acts 1899, ch. 198, § 3; Shan., § 302; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 33, 34; Code 1932, § 420; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, §§ 5, 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-802; modified.

Cross-References. Central mailing room for all state departments, institutions and agencies located at the state capitol maintained by department of general services, §4-3-1105.

4-8-103. Capitol employees.

The commissioner of general services is authorized to appoint one (1) or more security guards for the capitol and capitol grounds, who shall receive for services the sums appropriated, and one (1) or more porters, who shall receive the sums appropriated.

The commissioner may also appoint a landscape gardener to perform such duties in connection with the care of the grounds as may from time to time be necessary.

Acts 1899, ch. 198, § 4; Shan., § 303; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 33, 34; mod. Code 1932, § 421; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, §§ 5, 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-803.

Cross-References. State capitol commission staff, §4-8-303.

4-8-104. Police powers of security guards.

The security guards are vested with police powers.

It is their duty to arrest any and all persons committing nuisances or misdemeanors in or around the capitol, annexes, or on the grounds, or for other violation of law, and take such offender or offenders before some magistrate for trial and punishment.

Acts 1899, ch. 198, § 5; Shan., § 304; mod. Code 1932, § 422; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-804.

Cross-References. Disorderly conduct in a public place, penalty, §39-17-305.

4-8-105. Supervision of porters.

The commissioner of general services has general supervision and control of all porters appointed or employed at the expense of the state in connection with any and all of the departments in and about the capitol.

Acts 1899, ch. 198, § 7; Shan., § 304a1; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 33, 34; Code 1932, § 423; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, §§ 5, 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-805.